Florida, session 2026, HB573.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) The Agency for Health Care Administration
shall conduct or contract for a detailed fiscal impact study to
determine the feasibility of implementing the following
provisions relating to discounted drug prices under the 340B
Drug Pricing Program:
(a)1. Requiring drug manufacturers to sell a drug to
Medicaid pharmacies at not more than the 340B Drug Pricing
Program discounted price if the drug is:
a. On the Medicaid preferred drug list as described in s.
409.912(5), Florida Statutes.
b. A covered drug under the 340B Drug Pricing Program.
2. Authorizing drug manufacturers to deliver drugs sold in
accordance with subparagraph 1. to the purchasing Medicaid
pharmacy by any method used by the drug manufacturer.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb573-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 573 2026
3. If a drug manufacturer sells a drug in accordance with
subparagraph 1. to a Medicaid pharmacy at the 340B Drug Pricing
Program discounted price and such discounted price is higher
than the state Medicaid negotiated price, requiring the drug
manufacturer to pay a rebate to the state equal to the
difference between the discounted price and the state Medicaid
negotiated price.
(b) Requiring pharmacy benefits managers participating in
the Medicaid program to pay a Medicaid pharmacy the 340B Drug
Pricing Program discounted price plus the professional
dispensing fee as determined under rule 59G-4.251, Florida
Administrative Code, as amended, for any drug that is on the
Medicaid preferred drug list as described in s. 409.912(5),
Florida Statutes, and that is a covered drug under the 340B Drug
Pricing Program.
(c)1. Requiring drug wholesalers and distributors to sell
a drug to a Medicaid pharmacy at the 340B Drug Pricing Program
discounted price if the drug is:
a. On the Medicaid preferred drug list as described in s.
409.912(5), Florida Statutes.
b. A covered drug under the 340B Drug Pricing Program.
2. Prohibiting drug wholesalers and distributors from
changing an existing pricing model or program that is in place
with a Medicaid pharmacy by exempting a drug described in
paragraph (a) from the pricing model or program or by
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb573-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 573 2026
referencing such drug in any way in the pricing model or
program.
(d) Requiring Medicaid pharmacies to provide a covered
drug under the 340B Drug Pricing Program at the discounted price
only to Medicaid recipients.
(2) The agency shall submit the results of the study to
the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of
the House of Representatives, by January 31, 2027.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb573-00